seg/mar.2.dix
    <!-- numbers :S fix final ones -->
    <pardef n="__num">

      <e>   <p><l>व्या</l><r>व्या<s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <e>    <p><l>एक</l><r>एक<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>एका<j/></l><r>एक<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>एका<j/></l><r>एक<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>पहिल<j/></l><r>एक<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>एकपट</l><r>एक<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>दोन</l><r>दोन<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>दोघां<j/></l><r>दोन<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>दोघां<j/></l><r>दोन<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>दोन्ही</l><r>दोन<s n="num"/><s n="aggr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>    <p><l>दुसर<j/></l><r>दोन<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>दुप्पट</l><r>दोन<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>तीन</l><r>तीन<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>तिघां<j/></l><r>तीन<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>तिघां<j/></l><r>तीन<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>तीन्ही</l><r>तीन<s n="num"/><s n="aggr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>    <p><l>तिसर<j/></l><r>तीन<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>तिप्पट</l><r>तीन<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>चार</l><r>चार<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>चौघां<j/></l><r>चार<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>चौघां<j/></l><r>चार<s n="num"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
      <e>     <p><l>चारही</l><r>चार<s n="num"/><s n="aggr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>    <p><l>चौथ<j/></l><r>चार<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>चौपट</l><r>चार<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>पाच</l><r>पाच<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>पाचव<j/></l><r>पाच<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>पाचपट</l><r>पाच<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>सहा</l><r>सहा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सहाव<j/></l><r>सहा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सहापट</l><r>सहा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>सात</l><r>सात<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सातव<j/></l><r>सात<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सातपट</l><r>सात<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>आठ</l><r>आठ<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>आठव<j/></l><r>आठ<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>आठपट</l><r>आठ<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>नऊ</l><r>नऊ<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>नव्व<j/></l><r>नऊ<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>नऊपट</l><r>नऊ<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>दहा</l><r>दहा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>दहाव<j/></l><r>दहा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>दहापट</l><r>दहा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>अकरा</l><r>अकरा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>अकराव<j/></l><r>अकरा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>अकरापट</l><r>अकरा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>बारा</l><r>बारा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>बाराव<j/></l><r>बारा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>बारापट</l><r>बारा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>तेरा</l><r>तेरा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>तेराव<j/></l><r>तेरा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>तेरापट</l><r>तेरा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>चौदा</l><r>चौदा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>चौदाव<j/></l><r>चौदा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>चौदापट</l><r>चौदा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>पंधरा</l><r>पंधरा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>पंधराव<j/></l><r>पंधरा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>पंधरापट</l><r>पंधरा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>सोळा</l><r>सोळा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सोळाव<j/></l><r>सोळा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सोळापट</l><r>सोळा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>सतरा</l><r>सतरा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सतराव<j/></l><r>सतरा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>सतरापट</l><r>सतरा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>अठरा</l><r>अठरा<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>अठराव<j/></l><r>अठरा<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>अठरापट</l><r>अठरा<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>एकोणीस</l><r>एकोणीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>एकोणिसाव<j/></l><r>एकोणीस<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>एकोणीसपट</l><r>एकोणीस<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>वीस</l><r>वीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>विसाव<j/></l><r>वीस<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>वीसपट</l><r>वीस<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>एकवीस</l><r>एकवीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>एकविसाव<j/></l><r>एकवीस<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>एकवीसपट</l><r>एकवीस<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>बावीस</l><r>बावीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>बाविसाव<j/></l><r>बावीस<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>बावीसपट</l><r>बावीस<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>तेवीस</l><r>तेवीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>तेवीसव<j/></l><r>तेवीस<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>तेवीसपट</l><r>तेवीस<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>चोवीस</l><r>चोवीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>चोवीसव<j/></l><r>चोवीस<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>चोवीसपट</l><r>चोवीस<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>पंचवीस</l><r>पंचवीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>पंचवीसव<j/></l><r>पंचवीस<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
      <e>    <p><l>पंचवीसपट</l><r>पंचवीस<s n="num"/><s n="mult"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>


      <e>    <p><l>सव्वीस</l><r>सव्वीस<s n="num"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

    <e lm="">                 <i></i><par n="__num" /></e>
